Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB240.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1509(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1509. Qualifications for school bus driver endorsement.* * *(b) Proof of physical and vision examination.--(1) Every school bus driver shall carry a certificate issued by an examining physician or practitioner recognized by the department pursuant to section 1508.1 (relating to physical examinations), indicating that the person has passed the prescribed physical examination, including an examination of the eyes, within the preceding 13 months. The vision examination may be made by an optometrist or ophthalmologist.(2) The physical examination may include a hearing test 123456789101112131415161718 subject to this subsection. A person who requires the use of a hearing aid must undergo a hearing test to ensure that the hearing aid is properly functioning in a manner that allows the person to meet the department's minimum hearing standards. The department may not require an electroacoustic analysis test report of a person's hearing aid to determine whether the hearing aid meets the manufacturer's specifications if the hearing test determines that the hearing aid is functioning in a manner that allows the person to meet the department's minimum hearing standards.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0240PN0192 - 2 - 123456789101112